
DI−32 −DIAGNOSTICS ABS&VEHICLESTABILITYCONTROL(VSC)&
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

LANDCRUISER(W/G)SUP(RM73 1E)

DTC C0226 /2 1 toC0256 /24 ABSSolenoidCircuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
This solenoid goes on when signals are received from the ECU and controls the pressure acting on the wheel
cylinders thus controlling the braking force.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

C0226 /2 1
Openorshort circuit inSFRHorSFRRcircuit continues for
0.015sec.ormore.

SHydraulicbrakebooster
SSFRHorSFRRcircuit

C0236 / 22
Openorshort circuit inSFLHorSFLRcircuit continues for
0.015sec.ormore.

SHydraulicbrakebooster
SSFLHorSFLRcircuit

C0246 / 23
Openorshort circuit inSRRHorSRRRcircuit continues for
0.015sec.ormore.

SHydraulicbrakebooster
SSRRHorSRRRcircuit

C0256 / 24
Openorshort circuit inSRLHorSRLRcircuit continues for
0.015sec.ormore.

SHydraulicbrakebooster
SSRLHorSRLRcircuit

Fail safe function:
If trouble occurs in the actuator solenoid circuit, the ECU cuts off current to the ABS solenoid relay and pro-
hibits ABS & BA & TRC & VSC controls and the brake system becomes normal.
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WIRING DIAGRAM
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DI−34 −DIAGNOSTICS ABS & VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM731E)

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check hydraulic brake booster solenoid.

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the 2 connectors from hydraulic brake booster.
CHECK:
Check continuity between each of terminals A48 − 4 and A50
− 1, 2 , 3 , 4 , 7 , 8 , 9 a n d 10ofhydraulicbrakeboosterconnector.
OK:

Continuity
HINT:
Resistanceofeachsolenoidat20 ˚ C(68 ˚ F)
SFRH,SFLH,SRRH,SRLH:4.75 − 5.25 �

SFRR,SFLR,SRRR,SRLR:2.00 − 2.40 �

NG Replace hydraulic brake booster.

OK

2 Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between ABS & BA &
TRC & VSC ECU and actuator (See page IN−35).

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

If the same code is still output after the DTC is deleted, check the contact condition of each con-
nection. If the connections are normal, the ECU may be defective.


